Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1311.04
Corridor; building permit; subdivision plat; county clerk; issuance or approval; when.

When an officer is not now authorized to issue building permits, the county clerk shall be authorized to review and approve subdivision plats or issue building permits required by the provisions of sections 39-1311 to 39-1311.05.

Laws 1974, LB 805, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 11.